Georgia statutes. TITLE 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 2 State License Requirements and Regulations for Manufacture, Distribution, and Package Sales

Cross references.

Occupational taxes generally, T. 48, C. 13.

3-4-20.
Levy and amount of state occupational license tax; application for license.

An annual occupational license tax is imposed upon each distiller, manufacturer, broker, importer, wholesaler, fruit grower, and retail dealer of distilled spirits in this state, as follows:

Upon each distiller and manufacturer $ 1,000.00 (2) Upon each wholesale dealer 1,000.00 (3) Upon each importer 1,000.00 (4) Upon each fruit grower 500.00 (5) Upon each broker 100.00 (6) Upon each retail dealer 100.00 (7) Upon each special event use permit applicant 100.00

Click to view

An annual occupational license tax shall be paid for each place of business operated. An application for the applicable license required pursuant to this title along with the payment of the tax required by subsection (a) of this Code section shall be submitted to the department immediately upon assuming control of the place of business and annually thereafter for so long as the business is operated.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 103, §§ 5, 9; Ga. L. 1972, p. 207, § 4; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1125, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 923, § 2; Code 1933, § 5A-2501, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 30; Ga. L. 2012, p. 827, § 2/HB 1066.

3-4-21.
Prohibition of holding or having beneficial interest in more than two retail dealer licenses.

No person shall be issued more than two retail dealer licenses, nor shall any person be permitted to have a beneficial interest in more than two retail dealer licenses issued under this chapter, regardless of the degree of such interest.

For purposes of this Code section:

The term “person” shall include all members of a retail dealer licensee’s family; and the term “family” shall include any person related to the holder of the license within the first degree of consanguinity and affinity as computed according to the canon law.

The beneficiaries of a trust shall be considered to have a beneficial interest in any business forming a part of the trust estate.

Nothing contained in this Code section shall prohibit the reissuance of a valid retail dealer license if the license has been:

Held prior to the creation of any of the above relationships by marriage; or

Held prior to April 3, 1978.

History.

Ga. L. 1978, p. 1376, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-2502, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Retailer/Retail consumption dealers, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Department of Revenue, Alcohol and Tobacco Tax Unit, Subject 560-2-3.

3-4-21.1.
Requirement for retail license; application of existing license to new location.

A separate retail license shall be required for each place of business.

In cases where a retail licensee is moving his package sales business to a different location, he shall be authorized to make application to have the license for the location previously occupied apply to the new location. Anything contained in Code Section 3-4-21 to the contrary notwithstanding, if the retail licensee complies with all other requirements of law, the commissioner shall authorize the existing license to apply to the new location.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-2502.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1463, § 3; Code 1981, §

3-4-21.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1463, § 10.

3-4-22.
Filing of bonds by applicants for licenses generally.

All applicants for all licenses issued pursuant to this chapter shall file with the commissioner, along with each initial application, a bond:

Conditioned to pay all sums which may become due by the applicant to this state as taxes, license fees, or otherwise, arising out of the operation of the business for which licensure is sought; and

Conditioned to pay all penalties which may be imposed upon the applicant for failure to comply with the laws and rules and regulations pertaining to distilled spirits.

The surety for the bonds shall be a surety company licensed to do business in this state, and the bonds shall be in such form as may be required by the commissioner and may be for a term of up to five calendar years.

The bonds shall be in the following calendar year amounts:

For distillers and manufacturers, $10,000.00;

For wholesale dealers and importers, $5,000.00; and

For retail dealers and brokers, $2,500.00.

All applicants for annual renewal of licenses issued pursuant to this chapter, other than retail licenses, shall file an annual bond or have a multiyear bond on file with the department that extends at least through the end of the calendar year for which renewal is sought. Such bonds shall meet the same conditions as those filed with the initial application.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 103, § 10; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1426, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-2503, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 31; Ga. L. 2006, p. 206, § 8/HB 1248; Ga. L. 2014, p. 759, § 1/SB 240.

3-4-23.
Certificate of residence required for retail dealer’s license; intention of Code section.

No retail dealer’s license shall be issued to any person unless an application is filed with the commissioner, accompanied by a certificate by the judge of the probate court of the county of the applicant’s residence certifying that the applicant has been a bona fide resident of the county or municipality for at least 12 months immediately preceding the application and is a resident of the county or municipality where distilled spirits may be legally sold under this chapter.

It is the purpose and intention of this Code section to prevent the sale of distilled spirits in any county or municipality other than those where distilled spirits may be legally sold under this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 103, § 24; Ga. L. 1972, p. 207, § 10; Code 1933, § 5A-2504, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 32; Ga. L. 2006, p. 206, § 9/HB 1248.

3-4-24.
Issuance to fruit growers of license to manufacture distilled spirits; storage and disposition; limitations upon manufacture and sale; issuance of manufacturer’s or distiller’s license in certain counties or municipalities; tasting room limitations for certain licensees.

The commissioner may issue a license to a fruit grower authorizing the grower to manufacture distilled spirits from perishable fruits grown in this state.

If any distilled spirits are manufactured as permitted by this Code section in any county, municipality, or county area exclusive of certain incorporated areas, as the case may be, in which the distilled spirits are not to be sold under the terms of this chapter, the licensee shall immediately store the distilled spirits or alcohol in a warehouse or warehouses designated by the commissioner to be sold or disposed of under the supervision of the commissioner in states, counties, or municipalities permitting the legal sale of distilled spirits or alcohol.

It shall be unlawful for the licensee to sell or dispose of any such distilled spirits or alcohol:

In any municipality, county, or unincorporated area of a county in which the sale of distilled spirits or alcohol is prohibited by this chapter; or

To any person not holding an importer’s, broker’s, or wholesaler’s license issued pursuant to this chapter or by another state.

A manufacturer’s or distiller’s license may be issued pursuant to this Code section to a fruit grower for the manufacture of distilled spirits in any county or municipality of this state that has approved either the package sale of distilled spirits or the sale of distilled spirits by the drink, or both, as provided in this chapter.

The commissioner may issue a license pursuant to this Code section to a fruit grower licensed as a farm winery authorizing such fruit grower to manufacture distilled spirits and fortified wines for sale exclusively through a licensed and designated wholesaler; provided, however, that the farm winery has no more than one tasting room located on its licensed premises. For purposes of this subsection, the term “licensed premises” shall mean the premises for which the farm winery license is issued or property located contiguous to the farm winery and owned by the winery.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 103, § 9; Ga. L. 1972, p. 207, § 4; Code 1933, § 5A-2505, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1028, § 1/SB 114; Ga. L. 2014, p. 214, § 1/HB 825; Ga. L. 2015, p. 317, § 4/SB 63; Ga. L. 2017, p. 406, § 2/SB 85.

The 2017 amendment,

effective September 1, 2017, deleted former subsection (e), which read: “A manufacturer or distiller issued a license pursuant to this Code section may provide educational and promotional tours upon the issuance of a permit by the commissioner pursuant to Code Section 3-4-180.”; and redesignated former subsection (f) as present subsection (e).

3-4-24.1.
Distiller’s license authorizing manufacture of distilled spirits from agricultural products other than perishable fruits; storage.

The commissioner may issue a license authorizing the manufacture of distilled spirits from agricultural products other than perishable fruits grown in this state.

If any distilled spirits are manufactured as permitted by this Code section in any county, municipality, or county area exclusive of certain incorporated areas, as the case may be, in which the distilled spirits are not to be sold under the terms of this chapter, the licensee shall immediately store the distilled spirits or alcohol in a warehouse or warehouses designated by the commissioner to be sold or disposed of under the supervision of the commissioner in states, counties, or municipalities permitting the legal sale of distilled spirits or alcohol.

It is unlawful for the licensee to sell or dispose of any such distilled spirits or alcohol:

In any municipality, county, or unincorporated area of a county in which the sale of distilled spirits or alcohol is prohibited by this chapter; or

To any person not holding an importer’s, broker’s, or wholesaler’s license issued pursuant to this chapter or by another state.

A manufacturer’s or distiller’s license may be issued pursuant to this Code section for the manufacture of distilled spirits from agricultural products other than perishable fruits in any county or municipality of this state that has approved either the package sale of distilled spirits or the sale of distilled spirits by the drink, or both, as provided in this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-4-24.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 1028, § 2/SB 114; Ga. L. 2015, p. 317, § 5/SB 63; Ga. L. 2017, p. 406, § 3/SB 85.

The 2017 amendment,

effective September 1, 2017, deleted former subsection (e), which read: “A manufacturer or distiller issued a license pursuant to this Code section may provide educational and promotional tours upon the issuance of a permit by the commissioner pursuant to Code Section 3-4-180.”.

3-4-24.2.
Three-tier system of distribution and sale of distilled spirits; reporting; days and times for sale; sale price; taxes; regulatory authority; violations.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Licensed premises” means the physical premises where a distiller is licensed by the state as a manufacturer of distilled spirits.

“On-site production volume” means the volume of distilled spirits produced by distillation through one or more stills located at a licensed premises as part of a distiller’s process of engaging in the material and essential aspects of manufacturing such distilled spirits for human consumption.

A limited exception to the provisions of this title providing a three-tier system for the distribution and sale of distilled spirits shall exist to the extent that the license to manufacture distilled spirits in this state shall include the right of a licensed distiller to sell up to 750 barrels of distilled spirits per calendar year to individuals on such distiller’s licensed premises for personal use and not for resale, subject to the following terms and conditions:

Such retail sales of distilled spirits shall only be made to an individual who is physically on such distiller’s licensed premises and is of the age required by Code Section 3-3-23;

A maximum of three of such distiller’s licensed premises shall be permitted to make such retail sales. If such distiller has more than one licensed premises, such distiller shall annually designate the specific licensed premises, up to a maximum of three, from which such distiller has elected to exercise its limited right to sell distilled spirits pursuant to this subsection and shall provide notification of such designation to the department for each calendar year;

Such retail sales made for consumption on the premises shall not be subject to a daily maximum amount;

Such retail sales made for consumption off the premises shall not exceed a maximum of 4,500 milliliters of distilled spirits per individual per day;

Such distiller shall only make such retail sales of distilled spirits that such distiller has distilled, rectified, blended, aged, or bottled at one or more of its licensed premises;

Such distiller shall only make such retail sales of distilled spirits for which such distiller is the sole owner of the brand and brand label;

Beginning on April 1, 2022, and continuing thereafter, such distiller shall only make such retail sales of distilled spirits at a licensed premises at which such distiller reports on-site production volume, unless such licensed premises:

Operates under the same federal distilled spirits permit of a licensed premises of such distiller at which such distiller reports on-site production volume;

Is designated under paragraph (2) of this subsection as one of such distiller’s licensed premises for retail sales;

Is used for aging distilled spirits transferred from such distiller’s on-site production volume in wooden containers for a period exceeding one year at such licensed premises; provided, however, that such licensed premises may also be used for aging distilled spirits transferred to such licensed premises as permitted under subsection (d) of this Code section; and

Has physically located at such licensed premises at all times during such calendar year not less than 500 barrels of distilled spirits owned by such distiller that are being aged in wooden containers; and

Beginning on April 1, 2022, and continuing thereafter, the maximum volume of distilled spirits that such distiller may sell from each specific licensed premises permitted to make such retail sales under this subsection during any calendar quarter shall be limited as follows:

From a licensed premises at which such distiller reports on-site production volume, the maximum volume shall be the on-site production volume at such licensed premises during such calendar quarter; and

From a licensed premises that meets all of the qualifications described in subparagraphs (A) through (D) of paragraph (7) of this subsection, the maximum volume shall be the difference between:

The total aggregate on-site production volume of such distiller in this state among all of such distiller’s licensed premises during such calendar quarter; and

The total aggregate retail sales made by such distiller under this subsection at all other licensed premises at which such distiller makes retail sales under this subsection during such calendar quarter.

Each distiller shall file a report with the department every calendar quarter documenting all retail sales made under subsection (b) of this Code section and the on-site production volume of such distiller at each licensed premises in such manner and on such forms as designated by the department.

Nothing in this Code section shall prohibit a distiller from transferring any liquid, regardless of whether such liquid would be deemed to be a finished product of distilled spirits or was distilled by such distiller, to or from any of such distiller’s licensed premises or from selling such transferred liquid to individuals present at such distiller’s licensed premises, subject to the terms and limitations of subsection (b) of this Code section.

A distiller may sell distilled spirits pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section on all days and at all times that sales of distilled spirits by retailers and retail consumption dealers are lawful within the county or municipality in which the licensed premises of such distiller is located, including, but not limited to, Sundays.

A distiller shall not sell any distilled spirits for consumption off the premises pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section at a price less than the price at which a person licensed to sell distilled spirits by the package is permitted to sell distilled spirits pursuant to subsection (b) of Code Section 3-4-26.

Any distiller engaging in sales of distilled spirits pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section shall remit all state and local sales, use, and excise taxes to the proper tax collecting authority.

The commissioner shall promulgate and enforce such rules and regulations as he or she may deem reasonable and necessary to effectuate the provisions of this Code section.

Upon a violation by a distiller of any provision of this Code section or this title or any rule or regulation promulgated thereunder, the commissioner shall have the power to place conditions or limitations on such distiller’s license and to modify or amend such conditions or limitations.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-4-24.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2021, p. 493, § 1/HB 273.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective September 1, 2017.

This Code section became effective May 5, 2021.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, Code Section 3-4-24.2, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 820, § 1/HB 485, was redesignated as Code Section 3-4-24.3.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 493, § 1/HB 273, repealed former Code Section

3-4-24.2

, pertaining to three-tier system of distribution and sale of distilled spirits including Sunday sales, and enacted the present Code section. The former Code section was based on Code 1981, §

3-4-24.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 406, § 4/SB 85.

3-4-24.3.
Licensing for the manufacture or distribution of distilled spirits on local level.

The commissioner may issue licenses for the manufacture or distribution of distilled spirits in any county or municipality of this state in which licenses for such activity have been authorized and issued in accordance with the adoption of a resolution or ordinance by the local governing authority of such county or municipality. The local governing authority of a county or municipality issuing licenses pursuant to this Code section shall within its jurisdiction have the authority to determine the location of any licensed businesses, not inconsistent with this title.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-4-24.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 820, § 1/HB 485.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective May 9, 2017.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2017, this Code section, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 820, § 1/HB 485 as Code Section 3-4-24.2, was redesignated as Code Section 3-4-24.3.

3-4-25.
Holder of retail dealer’s license authorized to sell only unbroken packages; breaking of package or packages or drinking of contents thereof on premises prohibited.

Except as provided in Code Section 3-3-26 or Chapter 15 of this title, a retail dealer’s license shall authorize the holder to sell distilled spirits only in the original and unbroken package or packages, which shall contain not less than 50 milliliters each.

Except as provided in Code Section 3-3-26 or Chapter 15 of this title, a retail dealer’s license shall not permit the breaking of the package or packages on the premises where sold and shall not permit the drinking of the contents of the package or packages on the premises where sold.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 103, § 9; Ga. L. 1976, p. 990, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-2506, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 33; Ga. L. 1994, p. 553, § 2; Ga. L. 2020, p. 615, § 6/HB 879.

The 2020 amendment,

effective August 3, 2020, in subsection (a), substituted “Except as provided in Code Section 3-3-26 or Chapter 15 of this title, a” for “A” at the beginning and deleted “package or packages” preceding “shall contain”; and substituted “Except as provided in Code Section 3-3-26 or Chapter 15 of this title, a retail dealer’s” for “The” at the beginning of subsection (b).

3-4-26.
Display of advertisement or information regarding prices of distilled spirits in visible places; sales below cost prohibited; exceptions authorized.

No person holding a retail dealer’s license to deal in distilled spirits by the package shall display any advertisement of or information regarding the price or prices of any distilled spirits in any show window or other place visible from outside the licensee’s place of business.

No person licensed to sell distilled spirits by the package for carry-out purposes shall sell such beverages at a price less than the cost which such licensee pays for such distilled spirits. As used in this subsection, cost shall include the wholesale price plus the local excise tax imposed, as reflected in invoices which the commissioner of revenue may require to be maintained on said licensee’s place of business.

The commissioner of revenue shall be authorized to adopt such regulations as he or she deems necessary to provide for exception to the prohibition provided in subsection (b) of this Code section for reasons relating to liquidation of inventory, close-out of brands, outdated products, or any other reason the commissioner may determine to merit an exception.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 103, § 9A; Code 1933, § 5A-2507, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 34; Ga. L. 1996, p. 785, § 1.

Cross references.

Regulation of advertising generally, §

10-1-420

et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1996, p. 785, § 3, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.

3-4-27.
Notice of intention to secure retail dealer license for sale of distilled spirits.

No application for a retail dealer license for the sale of distilled spirits shall be acted upon until after the applicant has published in the newspaper which publishes the legal advertisements of the county wherein such person proposes to engage in business a notice of his intention to secure a retail dealer license. Such notice shall be published at least once during the 30 days immediately preceding the filing of the application for a license. Such notice shall be in large boldface type and shall state:

The type of license for which application has been filed;

The exact location of the place of business for which a license is sought;

The names and addresses of each owner of the business; and

If the applicant is a corporation, the names and titles of all corporate officers.

Proof of publication of the notice required by this Code section shall be attached to an application for a retail dealer license.

An applicant for a renewal license shall not be subject to the notice requirements of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-4-27

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 881, § 1.